Washington statutes.
RCW 19.230.370

Virtual currency licensees—Disclosures.

(1) Virtual currency licensees must provide to any person seeking to use the licensee's products or services the disclosures required by subsection (2) of this section.

(2) As applicable, virtual currency licensees must make the following disclosures:

(a) A schedule of all fees and charges the licensee may assess on a transaction, how the fees and charges will be calculated if not set in advance and disclosed, and the timing of the fees and charges.

(b) Whether the product or service provided is insured or guaranteed by an agency of the United States, such as the federal deposit insurance corporation or the securities investor protection corporation or by private insurance against theft or loss, including cybertheft or theft by other means.

(c) A notice that the transfer of virtual currency or digital units is irrevocable and any exception to the irrevocability of transfer.

(d) A notice describing the licensee's liability for unauthorized, mistaken, or accidental transfers and, describing the user's responsibility for providing notice of such mistake to the licensee and of general error-resolution rights applicable to any transaction.

(3) Licensees must provide any additional disclosures the director may require as set forth in rule.

(4) Disclosures required by this section must be made separately from any other information provided by the licensee and in a clear and conspicuous manner.

[ 2017 c 30 s 21.]